Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.324

Western College fund—Other revenue for support of Western Washington University.

No revenue from any source other than the general fund, which, except for the provisions hereof, would have been paid into the Western College fund, shall be used for any purpose except the support of the Western Washington University (formerly Western Washington State College).

[ 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 108; 1965 c 8 s 43.79.324. Prior: 1955 c 335 s 5.]

NOTES:

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.